California statutes. Civil Code
(b) In the superior court designated as the proper court in subdivision (a), the proper court location for trial of an action under this chapter is the location where the court tries that type of action that is nearest or most accessible to where the contract, conditional sale contract, or purchase order was in fact signed by the buyer, where the buyer resided at the time the contract, conditional sale contract, or purchase order was entered into, where the buyer resides at the commencement of the action, or where the motor vehicle purchased pursuant to the contract is permanently garaged. Otherwise, any location of the superior court designated as the proper superior court in subdivision (a) is the proper court location for the trial of the action. The court may specify by local rule the nearest or most accessible
court location where the court tries that type of case.

(c) In any action subject to this section, concurrently with the filing of the complaint, the plaintiff shall file an affidavit stating facts showing that the action has been commenced in a superior court and court location described in this section as a proper place for the trial of the action. Those facts may be stated in a verified complaint and shall not be stated on information or belief. When that affidavit is filed with the complaint, a copy shall be served with the summons. If a plaintiff fails to file the affidavit or state facts in a verified complaint required by this section, no further proceedings may occur, but the court shall, upon its own motion or upon motion of any party, dismiss the action without prejudice. The court may, on terms that are just, permit the affidavit to be filed subsequent to the filing of the complaint and a copy of the affidavit shall be served on the
defendant. The time to answer or otherwise plead shall date from that service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 806, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

2984.5.

(a) A seller shall maintain the following documents for at least seven years or the length of the conditional sales contract, whichever is longer:

(1) A copy of each buyer’s conditional sales contract.

(2) Any documents relied upon by the seller to determine a buyer’s creditworthiness, including, but not limited to, any consumer credit report, as defined in Section 1785.3, or any other document containing a
buyer’s credit score, as defined in Section 1785.15.1.

(3) If the conditional sales contract is sold, assigned, or otherwise transferred, a copy of the terms of that sale, assignment, or transfer.

(b) A seller that unlawfully fails to comply with a court order to produce the documents described in subdivision (a) shall be liable in an action brought by the Attorney General for a civil penalty of five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation. The penalties provided by this section are in addition to all rights and remedies that are otherwise available under law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 59, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2984.6.

A holder of a conditional sales contract, purchase order, or security interest, or the agent of a holder, who has received a notice pursuant to Section 7507.6 of the Business and Professions Code, shall not make a subsequent assignment to skip trace, locate, or repossess the vehicle without simultaneously, and in the same manner by which the assignment is given, advising the assignee of the assignment of the information contained in the notice. As used in this section, “assignment” has the same meaning set forth in Section 7500.1 of the Business and
Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 192, Sec. 4.   Effective September 7, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2c. Real Property Sales Contracts [2985. - 2985.6.]

2985.

(a) A real property sales contract is an agreement in which one party agrees to convey title to real property to another party upon the satisfaction of specified conditions set forth in the contract and that does not require conveyance of title within one year from the date of formation of the contract.

(b) For purposes of this chapter
only, a real property sales contract does not include a contract for purchase of an attached residential condominium unit entered into pursuant to a conditional public report issued by the Bureau of Real Estate pursuant to Section 11018.12 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 53.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

2985.1.

A real property sales contract may not be transferred by the fee owner of the real property unless accompanied by a transfer of the real property which is the subject of the contract, and real property may not be transferred by the fee owner thereof unless accompanied by an assignment of the contract.

Nothing herein shall be deemed to prohibit the assignment or pledge of a real property sales contract, as security or for the purpose of effecting collection thereon, to the holder of a first lien on the real property which is the subject of the contract without a transfer of the real property or the transfer of a fee title in
trust without the concurrent assignment of the sales contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 71.)
-------------------------------------------

2985.2.

Any person, or the assignee of such person, who sells a parcel of land under a sales contract which is not recorded and who thereafter causes an encumbrance or encumbrances not consented to in writing by the parties upon such property in an amount which, together with existing encumbrances thereon exceeds the amount then due under the contract, or under which the aggregate amount of any periodic
payments exceeds the periodic payments due on the contract, excluding any pro rata amount for insurance and taxes, shall be guilty of a public offense punishable by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 36.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

2985.3.

Every seller of improved or unimproved real property under a real property sales contract, or his assignee, who knowingly receives an installment payment from the buyer under a real property sales contract at a time when there is then due any payment by the seller, or his assignee, on an obligation secured by an encumbrance on the property subject to the real property sales contract, and who
appropriates such payment received from the buyer to a use other than payment of the amount then due on the seller’s or assignee’s obligation, except to the extent the payment received from the buyer exceeds the amount due from the seller or assignee, is guilty of a public offense punishable by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 37.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

2985.4.

Every seller of improved or unimproved real property under a real property sales contract who receives pro rata payments for insurance and taxes shall hold these amounts in trust for the purpose designated. These amounts shall not be disbursed for any other purpose without the consent of the payor and any person or corporation holding an encumbrance on the property.

This section shall not apply to a state- or federal-supervised assignee of a seller who as agent for the seller receives and disburses payments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 560.)
-------------------------------------------

2985.5.

Every real property sales contract entered into after January 1, 1966, shall contain a statement of:

(a) The number of years required to complete payment in accordance with the terms of the contract.

(b) The basis upon which the tax estimate is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1214.)
-------------------------------------------

2985.51.

(a) Every real property sales contract entered into on and after January 1, 1978, where the real property that is the subject of such contract resulted from a division of real property occurring on or after January 1, 1978, shall contain or have attached thereto a statement indicating the fact that the division creating the parcel or parcels to be conveyed:

(1) Was made in compliance with the provisions of the Subdivision Map Act, Division 2 (commencing with Section 66410) of Title 7 of the Government Code and local ordinances adopted pursuant thereto, and in such event the statement
shall expressly refer to the location, in the records of the county recorder for the county in which the real property is located, of a previously recorded certificate of compliance or conditional certificate of compliance issued pursuant to Section 66499.35 of the Government Code with respect to the real property being sold, or the statement shall describe the real property to be conveyed as an entire lot or parcel by referencing the recorded final or parcel map creating the parcel or parcels to be conveyed and such description shall constitute a certificate of compliance as set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 66499.35 of the Government Code. Provided, however, where reference is made to a recorded parcel map and the approval of such map was conditioned upon the construction of specified offsite and onsite improvements as a precondition to the issuance of a permit or grant of approval for the development of such parcel and the construction of the improvements has not been completed as of the date of
execution of the real property sales contract, then the statement shall expressly set forth all such required offsite and onsite improvements; or

(2) Was exempt from the provisions of the Subdivision Map Act and local ordinances adopted pursuant thereto, and in such event the statement shall expressly set forth the basis for such exemption; or

(3) Was the subject of a waiver of the provisions of the Subdivision Map Act and local ordinances adopted pursuant thereto, and in such event the contract shall have attached thereto a copy of the document issued by the local agency granting the waiver. Provided, however, where the granting of the waiver was conditioned upon the construction of specified offsite and onsite improvements as a precondition to the issuance of a permit or grant of approval for the development of the parcel and the construction of the improvements has not been
completed as of the date of execution of the real property sales contract, then such statement shall expressly set forth all such required offsite and onsite improvements; or

(4) Was not subject to the provisions of the Subdivision Map Act and local ordinances adopted pursuant thereto, and in such event the statement shall expressly set forth the basis for the nonapplicability of the Subdivision Map Act to the division.

(b) Every real property sales contract entered into after January 1, 1978, where the real property that is the subject of such contract resulted from a division of real property occurring prior to January 1, 1978, shall:

(1) Contain or have attached thereto a signed statement by the vendor that the parcel or parcels which are the subject of the contract have been created in compliance with, or a
waiver has been granted with respect to, the provisions of the Subdivision Map Act, Division 2 (commencing with Section 66410) of Title 7 of the Government Code and local ordinances adopted pursuant thereto, or any prior law regulating the division of land, or, were exempt from or not otherwise subject to any such law at the time of their creation. Provided, however, where the division creating the parcel or parcels being conveyed was by means of a parcel map, or in the event that a waiver of the provisions of the Subdivision Map Act has been granted, and the approval of the parcel map or the granting of the waiver was conditioned upon the construction of specified offsite and onsite improvements as a precondition to the issuance of a permit or grant of approval for the development of such parcel and the construction of the improvements has not been completed as of the date of execution of the real property sales contract, then such contract shall expressly set forth all such required offsite and onsite
improvements.

(2) In lieu of the above, the vendor may include in the real property sales contract a description of the real property being conveyed as an entire lot or parcel by referencing the recorded final or parcel map creating the parcel or parcels being conveyed and such description shall constitute a certificate of compliance as set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 66499.35 of the Government Code. Provided, however, where reference is made to a recorded parcel map, or in the event that a waiver of the provisions of the Subdivision Map Act has been granted, and the approval of the parcel map or the granting of the waiver was conditioned upon the construction of specified offsite and onsite improvements as a precondition to the issuance of a permit or grant of approval for the development of such parcel and the construction of the improvements has not been completed as of the date of execution of the real property sales contract, then
such contract shall expressly set forth all such required offsite and onsite improvements.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), in the event that the parcel or parcels which are the subject of the real property sales contract were not created in compliance with the provisions of the Subdivision Map Act, Division 2 (commencing with Section 66410) of Title 7 of the Government Code and local ordinances adopted pursuant thereto, or any other prior law regulating the division of land, and were not exempt from, or were otherwise subject to any such law at the time of their creation, the real property sales contract shall contain a statement signed by the vendor and vendee acknowledging such fact. In addition, the vendor shall attach to the real property sales contract a conditional certificate of compliance issued pursuant to Section 66499.35 of the Government Code.

(c) In the
event that the parcel or parcels which are the subject of the real property sales contract are found not to have been created in compliance with, or a waiver has not been granted with respect to, the provisions of the Subdivision Map Act, Division 2 (commencing with Section 66410) of Title 7 of the Government Code, or any other prior law regulating the division of land nor to be exempt from, or otherwise subject to such laws and the vendee has reasonably relied upon the statement of such compliance or exemption made by the vendor, or in the event that the vendor has failed to provide the conditional certificate of compliance as required by paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), and the vendor knew or should have known of the fact of such noncompliance, or lack of exemption, or the failure to provide the conditional certificate of compliance, the vendee, or his successor in interest, shall be entitled to: (1) recover from the vendor or his assigns the amount of all costs incurred by the
vendee or his successor in interest in complying with all conditions imposed pursuant to Section 66499.35 of the Government Code; or, (2) the real property sales contract, at the sole option of the vendee, or his successor in interest, shall be voidable and in such event the vendee or his successor in interest shall be entitled to damages from the vendor or his assigns. For purposes of this section, damages shall mean all amounts paid under the real estate sales contract with interest thereon at the rate of 9 percent per annum, and in addition thereto a civil penalty in the amount of five hundred dollars ($500) plus attorney’s fees and costs. Any action to enforce the rights of a vendee or his successor in interest shall be commenced within one year of the date of discovery of the failure to comply with the provisions of this section.

(d) Any vendor who willfully violates the provisions of subdivision (a) of this section
by knowingly providing a vendee with a false statement of compliance with, exemption from, waiver of, or nonapplicability of, the provisions of the Subdivision Map Act, with respect to the real property that is the subject of the real property sales contract, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisonment for not to exceed six months, or both such fine and imprisonment.

(e) For purposes of this section a real property sales contract is an agreement wherein one party agrees to convey title to unimproved real property to another party upon the satisfaction of specified conditions set forth in the contract and which does not require conveyance of title within one year from the date of formation of the contract. Unimproved real property means real property upon which no permanent structure intended for human occupancy or commercial use is located.

(f) The provisions of this section shall not apply to a real property sales contract which, by its terms, requires either a good faith downpayment and a single payment of the balance of the purchase price or a single payment of the purchase price upon completion of the contract, and the provisions of such contract do not require periodic payment of principal or interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1228.)
-------------------------------------------

2985.6.

(a) A buyer shall be entitled to prepay all or any part of the balance due on any real property sales contract with respect to the sale of land which has been subdivided into a residential lot or lots which contain a dwelling for not more than four families entered into on or after January 1, 1969; provided, however, that the seller, by an agreement in writing with the buyer, may prohibit prepayment for up to a 12-month period following the sale.

(b) Any waiver by the buyer of the provisions of this section shall be deemed contrary to public policy and shall be unenforceable and
void; provided, however, that any such waiver shall in no way affect the validity of the remainder of the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 565.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2d. Vehicle Leasing Act [2985.7. - 2993.]

2985.7.

(a) “Motor vehicle” means any vehicle required to be registered under the Vehicle Code. Motor vehicle does not include any trailer which is sold in conjunction with a vessel.

(b) “Lessor” includes “bailor” and is a person who is engaged in the business of leasing, offering to lease or arranging the lease of a motor vehicle under a lease contract.

For the purpose of this subdivision, “person” means an individual, partnership,
corporation, limited liability company, estate, trust, cooperative, association or any other legal entity.

(c) “Lessee” includes “bailee” and is a natural person who leases, offers to lease or is offered the lease of a motor vehicle under a lease contract.

(d) “Lease contract” means any contract for or in contemplation of the lease or bailment for the use of a motor vehicle, and the purchase of services incidental thereto, by a natural person for a term exceeding four months, primarily for personal, family or household purposes, whether or not it is agreed that the lessee bear the risk of the motor vehicle’s depreciation. Lease contract does not include a lease for agricultural, business or commercial purposes, or to a government or governmental agency or instrumentality.

(e) “Regulation M” means any rule,
regulation, or interpretation promulgated by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System under the federal Consumer Leasing Act (15 U.S.C. Secs. 1667-1667e), and any interpretation or approval issued by an official or employee of the Federal Reserve System duly authorized by the board to issue such interpretations or approvals.

(f) “Constant yield method” means the following:

(1) In the case of a periodic payment lease, the method of determining the rent charge portion of each base payment in which the rent charge for each computational period is earned in advance by multiplying the constant rate implicit in the lease contract times the balance subject to rent charge as it declines during the scheduled lease term. At any time during the scheduled term of a periodic payment lease, the balance subject to rent charge is the difference between the adjusted capitalized cost
and the sum of (A) all depreciation and other amortized amounts accrued during the preceding computational periods and (B) the first base periodic payment.

(2) In the case of a single payment lease, the method of determining the periodic earning of rent charges in which the rent charge for each computational period is earned in advance by multiplying the constant rate implicit in the lease contract times the balance subject to rent charge as it increases during the scheduled lease term. At any time during the scheduled term of a single payment lease, the balance subject to rent charge is determined by subtracting from the residual value the total rent charge scheduled to be earned over the term of the lease contract and adding to the difference all rent charges accrued during the preceding computational periods.

(3) Periodic rent charge calculations are based on the assumption
that the lessor will receive the lease payments on their exact due dates and that the lease does not end before its scheduled termination date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 800, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2985.71.

(a) Any solicitation to enter into a lease contract that includes any of the following items shall contain the disclosures described in subdivision (b):

(1) The amount of any payment.

(2) A statement of any capitalized cost reduction or other payment required prior to or at consummation or by delivery, if delivery occurs after consummation.

(3) A statement that no capitalized cost
 reduction or other payment is required prior to or at consummation or by delivery, if delivery occurs after consummation.

(b) A solicitation to enter into a lease contract that includes any item listed in subdivision (a) shall also clearly and conspicuously state all of the following items:

(1) All of the disclosures prescribed by Regulation M set forth in the manner required or permitted by Regulation M, whether or not Regulation M applies to the transaction.

(2) The mileage limit after which mileage charges may accrue and the charge per mile for mileage in excess of the stated mileage
 limit.

(3) The statement “Plus tax and license” or a substantially similar statement, if amounts due for use tax, license fees, and registration fees are not included in the payments.

(c) No solicitation to aid, promote, or assist directly or indirectly any lease contract may state that a specific lease of any motor vehicle at specific amounts or terms is available unless the lessor usually and customarily leases or will lease that motor vehicle at those amounts or terms.

(d) A failure to comply with the provisions of this section shall not affect the validity of the leasing contract. No
 owner or employee of any entity, other than the lessor, that serves as a medium in which a lease solicitation appears or through which a lease solicitation is disseminated, shall be liable under this section. 

(e) A lessor is not in violation of paragraph (29) of subdivision (a) of Section 1770 because it excludes from the advertised, displayed, or offered lease payment a fee or charge in accordance with paragraph (3) of subdivision (b).

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 5) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 400, Sec. 6.   (SB 478)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2985.8.

(a) A lease contract shall be in writing, and the print portion of the contract shall be printed in at least 8-point type and shall contain in a single document all of the agreements of the lessor and lessee with respect to the obligations of each party.

(b) At the top of the lease contract, a title that contains the words “LEASE CONTRACT” or “LEASE AGREEMENT” shall appear in at least 12-point boldface type.

(c) A lease contract shall disclose all of the following:

(1) All of the information prescribed by Regulation M set forth in the manner required or permitted by
 Regulation M, whether or not Regulation M applies to the transaction.

(2) A separate statement labeled “Itemization of Gross Capitalized Cost” that shall appear immediately following or directly adjacent to the disclosures required to be segregated by Regulation M. The Itemization of Gross Capitalized Cost shall include all of the following and shall be circumscribed by a line:

(A) The agreed-upon value of the vehicle as equipped at the time of signing the lease.

(B) The agreed-upon value and a description of each accessory and item of optional equipment the lessor agrees to add to the vehicle after signing the lease.

(C) The premium for each policy of
 insurance.

(D) The amount charged for each service contract.

(E) Any charge for an optional debt cancellation agreement.

(F) Any outstanding prior credit or lease balance.

(G) An itemization by type and agreed-upon value of each good or service included in the gross capitalized cost other than those items included in the disclosures required in subparagraphs (A) to (F), inclusive.

(3) The vehicle identification number of the leased vehicle.

(4) A brief description of each vehicle or other property being traded in and the agreed-upon value of the
 vehicle or property if the amount due at the time of signing the lease or upon delivery is paid in whole or in part with a net trade-in allowance or the “Itemization of Gross Capitalized Cost” includes any portion of the outstanding prior credit or lease balance from the trade-in property.

(5) The charge, if any, to be retained by the lessor for document processing authorized pursuant to Section 4456.5 of the Vehicle Code, which may not be represented as a governmental fee.

(6) The charge, if any, to electronically register or transfer the vehicle authorized pursuant to Section 4456.5 of the Vehicle Code, which shall not be represented as a governmental fee.

(d) A lease contract shall contain, in at least 8-point boldface type,
 above the space provided for the lessee’s signature and circumscribed by a line, the following notice: “(1) Do not sign this lease before you read it or if it contains any blank spaces to be filled in; (2) You are entitled to a completely filled in copy of this lease; (3) Warning—Unless a charge is included in this lease for public liability or property damage insurance, payment for that coverage is not provided by this lease.”

(e) A lease contract shall contain, in at least 8-point boldface type, on the first page of the contract and circumscribed by a line, the following notice:

“THERE IS NO COOLING OFF PERIOD

California law does not provide for a “cooling off” or other cancellation period for vehicle leases. Therefore, you cannot later cancel
 this lease simply because you change your mind, decided the vehicle costs too much, or wish you had acquired a different vehicle. You may cancel this lease only with the agreement of the lessor or for legal cause, such as fraud.”
(f) A lease contract shall contain, in at least 8-point boldface
 type, the following notice: “You have the right to return the vehicle, and receive a refund of any payments made if the credit application is not approved, unless nonapproval results from an incomplete application or from incorrect information provided by you.”

(g) The lease contract shall be signed by the lessor and lessee, or their authorized representatives, and an exact copy of the fully executed lease contract shall be provided to the lessee at the time of signing.

(h) A motor vehicle shall not be delivered under a lease contract subject to this chapter until the lessor provides to the lessee a fully executed copy of the lease contract.

(i) The lessor shall not obtain the signature of the lessee to a contract
 when it contains blank spaces to be filled in after it has been signed.

(j) If the lease contract contains a provision that holds the lessee liable for the difference between (1) the adjusted capitalized cost disclosed in the lease contract reduced by the amounts described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 2987 and (2) the settlement proceeds of the lessee’s required insurance and deductible in the event of theft or damage to the vehicle that results in a total loss, the lease contract shall contain the following notice in at least 8-point boldface type on the first page of the contract:

“GAP LIABILITY NOTICE

In the event of theft or damage to the vehicle that results in a total loss, there may be a GAP
 between the amount due upon early termination and the proceeds of your insurance settlement and deductible. THIS LEASE PROVIDES THAT YOU ARE LIABLE FOR THE GAP AMOUNT. Optional coverage for the GAP amount may be offered for an additional price.”
(k) This section shall remain in effect only until October 1, 2026, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 354, Sec. 4.   (SB 766)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of October 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 5 of Stats. 2025, Ch.354.)
-------------------------------------------

2985.8.

(a) A lease contract shall be in writing, and the print portion of the contract shall be printed in at least 8-point type and shall contain in a single document all of the agreements of the lessor and lessee with respect to the obligations of each party.

(b) At the top of the lease contract, a title that contains the words “LEASE CONTRACT” or “LEASE AGREEMENT” shall appear in at least 12-point boldface type.

(c) A lease contract shall disclose all of the following:

(1) All of the information prescribed by Regulation M set forth in the manner required or permitted
 by Regulation M, whether or not Regulation M applies to the transaction.

(2) A separate statement labeled “Itemization of Gross Capitalized Cost” that shall appear immediately following or directly adjacent to the disclosures required to be segregated by Regulation M. The Itemization of Gross Capitalized Cost shall include all of the following and shall be circumscribed by a line:

(A) The agreed-upon value of the vehicle as equipped at the time of signing the lease.

(B) The agreed-upon value and a description of each accessory and item of optional equipment the lessor agrees to add to the vehicle after signing the lease.

(C) The premium for each policy of
 insurance.

(D) The amount charged for each service contract.

(E) Any charge for an optional debt cancellation agreement.

(F) Any outstanding prior credit or lease balance.

(G) An itemization by type and agreed-upon value of each good or service included in the gross capitalized cost other than those items included in the disclosures required in subparagraphs (A) to (F), inclusive.

(3) The vehicle identification number of the leased vehicle.

(4) A brief description of each vehicle or other property being traded in and the agreed-upon value of the
 vehicle or property if the amount due at the time of signing the lease or upon delivery is paid in whole or in part with a net trade-in allowance or the “Itemization of Gross Capitalized Cost” includes any portion of the outstanding prior credit or lease balance from the trade-in property.

(5) The charge, if any, to be retained by the lessor for document processing authorized pursuant to Section 4456.5 of the Vehicle Code, which may not be represented as a governmental fee.

(6) The charge, if any, to electronically register or transfer the vehicle authorized pursuant to Section 4456.5 of the Vehicle Code, which shall not be represented as a governmental fee.

(d) A lease contract shall contain, in at least 8-point boldface type,
 above the space provided for the lessee’s signature and circumscribed by a line, the following notice: “(1) Do not sign this lease before you read it or if it contains any blank spaces to be filled in; (2) You are entitled to a completely filled in copy of this lease; (3) Warning—Unless a charge is included in this lease for public liability or property damage insurance, payment for that coverage is not provided by this lease.”

(e) A lease contract shall contain the disclosure identified in subdivision (e) of Section 1784.43.

(f) A lease contract shall contain, in at least 8-point boldface type, the following notice: “You have the right to return the vehicle, and receive a refund of any payments made if the credit application is not approved, unless nonapproval results from an incomplete
 application or from incorrect information provided by you.”

(g) The lease contract shall be signed by the lessor and lessee, or their authorized representatives, and an exact copy of the fully executed lease contract shall be provided to the lessee at the time of signing.

(h) A motor vehicle shall not be delivered under a lease contract subject to this chapter until the lessor provides to the lessee a fully executed copy of the lease contract.

(i) The lessor shall not obtain the signature of the lessee to a contract when it contains blank spaces to be filled in after it has been signed.

(j) If the lease contract contains a provision that holds the lessee liable
 for the difference between (1) the adjusted capitalized cost disclosed in the lease contract reduced by the amounts described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 2987 and (2) the settlement proceeds of the lessee’s required insurance and deductible in the event of theft or damage to the vehicle that results in a total loss, the lease contract shall contain the following notice in at least 8-point boldface type on the first page of the contract:

“GAP LIABILITY NOTICE

In the event of theft or damage to the vehicle that results in a total loss, there may be a GAP between the amount due upon early termination and the proceeds of your insurance settlement and deductible. THIS LEASE PROVIDES THAT YOU ARE LIABLE FOR THE GAP AMOUNT. Optional coverage for the GAP amount may
 be offered for an additional price.”
(k) This section shall become operative on October 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 4) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 354, Sec. 5.   (SB 766)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative October 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2985.9.

The following documents and agreements are not required to be contained in a lease contract:

(a) An “express warranty,” as that term is defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1791.2, whether it relates to the sale or lease of a consumer good.

(b) Titling and transfer documents utilized to register, title, or transfer ownership of vehicles described in the lease contract with government registration authorities.

(c) Insurance policies, service contracts, and optional debt cancellation agreements.

(d) Documents that memorialize the sale or lease of goods or services, relating to the leased vehicle, between the provider of those goods or services and lessee that are included in the gross capitalized cost of the lease and separately itemized in the “Itemization of Gross Capitalized Cost.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 287, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2986.3.

No lease contract shall contain any provision by which:

(a) A power of attorney is given to confess judgment in this state, or an assignment of wages is given; provided that nothing herein contained shall prohibit the giving of an assignment of wages contained in a separate instrument pursuant to Section 300 of the Labor Code.

(b) The lessee waives any right of action against the lessor or holder of the contract or other person
acting on his or her behalf for any illegal act committed in the collection of payments under the contract or in the repossession of the motor vehicle.

(c) The lessee relieves the lessor from liability for any legal remedies which the lessee may have against the lessor under the contract or any separate instruments executed in connection therewith.

(d) The lessor or holder of the contract is given the right to commence action on a contract under the provisions of this chapter in a county other than the county in which the contract was in fact signed by the lessee, the county in which the lessee resides at the commencement of the action, the county in which the lessee resided at the time the contract was entered into or in the county in which the motor vehicle leased pursuant to such contract is permanently garaged.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 800, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2986.4.

Any acknowledgment by the lessee of delivery of a copy of a lease contract or purchase order and any vehicle lease proposal and any credit statement which the lessor has required or requested the lessee to sign, and which the lessee has signed, during the contract negotiations, shall be printed or written in size equal to at least 10-point bold type and, if contained in the contract, shall appear directly above the space reserved for the lessee’s signature. The lessee’s written acknowledgment, conforming to the requirements of this section, of delivery of a
completely filled in copy of the contract, and a copy of such other documents shall be a rebuttable presumption of delivery in any action or proceeding by or against a third party without knowledge to the contrary when he or she acquired his or her interest in the contract. If such third party furnishes the lessee a copy of such documents, or a notice containing items set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 2985.8, and stating that the lessee shall notify such third party in writing within 30 days if he or she was not furnished a copy of such documents, and no such notification is given, it shall be conclusively presumed in favor of such a third party that copies of the documents were furnished as required by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 800, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2986.5.

(a) No person shall lease a used motor vehicle for operation on California highways if such vehicle does not meet all of the equipment requirements of Division 12 (commencing with Section 24000) of the Vehicle Code. This subdivision does not apply to an extension or a subsequent lease of the same motor vehicle to the same lessee.

(b) If a lessee of a vehicle pays to the lessor an amount for the licensing or transfer of title of the vehicle which amount is in excess of the actual fees due for such licensing or transfer, or which amount is in excess of the amount which has been paid,